Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1491.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8102(10) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8102. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:* * *(10) The [Department of Health should] commissioner shall continually assess and, as needed, revise the functions of emergency medical services agencies and providers and other components of the emergency medical services system 12345678910111213141516171819202122 that it regulates under this chapter to:(i) improve the quality of emergency medical services provided in this Commonwealth;(ii) have the emergency medical services system adapt to changing needs of the residents of this Commonwealth; and(iii) promote the recruitment and retention of persons willing and qualified to serve as emergency medical services providers in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. The definitions of "advanced emergency medical technician," "ambulance attendant," "board," "Commonwealth emergency medical services medical director" or "Commonwealth EMS medical director," "department," "emergency medical responder" or "EMR," "emergency medical services agency" or "EMS agency," "emergency medical services agency medical director" or "EMS agency medical director," "emergency medical services provider" or "EMS provider," "emergency medical services vehicle operator" or "EMS vehicle operator," "emergency medical technician" or "EMT," "medical command physician," "paramedic," "peer review," "prehospital emergency medical services physician" or "prehospital EMS physician," "prehospital physician extender" or "PHPE," "prehospital registered nurse" or "PHRN," "regional emergency medical services council" or "regional EMS council" and "review organization" in section 8103 of Title 35 are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 8103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 20250HB1491PN1745 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Advanced emergency medical technician." An individual who is certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner as an advanced emergency medical technician.* * *"Ambulance attendant." An individual who is 16 years of age or older and satisfies one of the following:(1) Possesses a certificate evidencing successful completion of an advanced first aid course sponsored by the American Red Cross and a current certificate evidencing successful completion of a cardiopulmonary resuscitation course acceptable to the [Department of Health] commissioner.(2) Possesses a current certificate evidencing successful completion of a course determined by the [Department of Health] commissioner to be equivalent to the requirements in paragraph (1).* * *"Board." [The State Advisory Board, which is the Board of Directors of the Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council.] The State Emergency Medical Service Advisory Board or EMS Advisory Board.* * *"Commissioner." The State Emergency Medical Services Commissioner or EMS Commissioner."Commonwealth emergency medical services medical director" or "Commonwealth EMS medical director." A physician who is approved and employed by the [Department of Health] commissioner to advise and formulate policy on matters pertaining to emergency medical services.20250HB1491PN1745 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Council." The Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council.["Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth.]* * *"Emergency medical responder" or "EMR." An individual who is certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner as an emergency medical responder.* * *"Emergency medical services agency" or "EMS agency." An entity that engages in the business or service of providing emergency medical services to patients within this Commonwealth by operating any of the following:(1) An ambulance.(2) An advanced life support squad vehicle.(3) A basic life support squad vehicle.(4) A quick response service.(5) A special operations EMS service. This paragraph includes, but is not limited to:(i) a tactical EMS service;(ii) a wilderness EMS service;(iii) a mass-gathering EMS service; and(iv) an urban search and rescue EMS service.(6) A vehicle or service which provides emergency medical services outside of a health care facility, as prescribed by the [Department of Health] commissioner by regulation."Emergency medical services agency medical director" or "EMS agency medical director." A physician who is employed by, 20250HB1491PN1745 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contracts with or volunteers with an emergency medical services agency either directly or through an intermediary to:(1) evaluate the quality of patient care provided by the emergency medical services providers utilized by the emergency medical services agency; and(2) provide medical guidance and advice to the emergency medical services agency."Emergency medical services provider" or "EMS provider." Any of the following:(1) An emergency medical responder.(2) An emergency medical technician.(3) An advanced emergency medical technician.(4) A paramedic.(5) A prehospital registered nurse.(6) A prehospital physician extender.(7) A prehospital emergency medical services physician.(8) An individual prescribed by regulation of the [Department of Health] commissioner to provide specialized emergency medical services.* * *"Emergency medical services vehicle operator" or "EMS vehicle operator." An individual certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner to operate a ground emergency medical services vehicle."Emergency medical technician" or "EMT." An individual who is certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner as an emergency medical technician.* * *"Medical command physician." A physician certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner to give medical command 20250HB1491PN1745 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 orders to emergency medical services providers.* * *"Paramedic." An individual who is certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner as a paramedic.* * *"Peer review." The evaluation by health care providers of the quality and efficiency of services ordered or performed by emergency medical services providers and physicians who direct or supervise EMS providers under this chapter and the regulations of the [Department of Health] commissioner.* * *"Prehospital emergency medical services physician" or "prehospital EMS physician." A physician who is certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner as a prehospital emergency medical services physician."Prehospital physician extender" or "PHPE." A physician assistant who is certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner as a prehospital physician extender."Prehospital registered nurse" or "PHRN." A registered nurse who is certified by the [Department of Health] commissioner as a prehospital registered nurse.* * *"Regional emergency medical services council" or "regional EMS council." A nonprofit incorporated entity or appropriate equivalent that is assigned by the [Department of Health] commissioner to:(1) plan, develop, maintain, expand and improve emergency medical services systems within a specific geographic area of this Commonwealth; and(2) coordinate those systems into a regional emergency 20250HB1491PN1745 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical services system.* * *"Review organization." A committee which engages in peer review as authorized by the regulations of the [Department of Health] commissioner.* * *Section 3. Sections 8104(a) introductory paragraph and (13) and (b) and 8105 heading, (a), (b) introductory paragraph and (4) and (c) of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 8104. Emergency medical services system programs.(a) Planning and coordination.--The [department] commissioner shall plan, guide and coordinate programs on the following matters to promote effective and efficient operation of Statewide and regional EMS systems:* * *(13) The provision of periodic comprehensive review and evaluation of the extent and quality of the EMS provided in each regional EMS system and reports to the [department] commissioner of each review or evaluation.* * *(b) Limitations.--This section is intended to identify EMS objectives to be pursued and achieved by the [department] commissioner in its role as lead agency for EMS. Nothing herein shall be construed to confer regulatory powers upon the [department] commissioner beyond those conferred elsewhere in this chapter.§ 8105. Duties of [department] commissioner.(a) Duty.--It shall be the duty of the [department] commissioner to assist in the development of local EMS systems; plan, guide and coordinate the development of regional EMS 20250HB1491PN1745 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systems into a unified Statewide system; and coordinate systems in this Commonwealth with similar systems in neighboring states.(b) Authority.--The [department] commissioner shall be the lead agency for EMS in this Commonwealth. The [department] commissioner is authorized to:* * *(4) Collect, as deemed necessary and appropriate, data and information regarding patients who utilize emergency departments without being admitted to the facility and patients admitted through emergency departments, trauma centers or directly to special care units, in a manner that protects and maintains the confidential nature of patient records. The data and information shall be reasonable in detail and shall be collected pursuant to regulations issued by the [department] commissioner. Data and information shall be limited to that which may be used for specific planning, research and quality improvement purposes and shall not be duplicative of data and information already available to the [department] commissioner.* * *(c) EMS protocols.--The [department] commissioner shall establish criteria and protocols, including bypass protocols, for evaluation, triage, treatment, transport, transfer and referral of patients to ensure that they receive appropriate EMS and are transported to the most appropriate facility. Regional EMS councils shall not be eligible for contracts or grant funds or State EMS Operating Fund disbursements unless they assist in ensuring regional implementation of the criteria and protocols. Protocols under this subsection are not subject to the rulemaking process.20250HB1491PN1745 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8105.1. State EMS Advisory Board.(a) Establishment.--(1) The State EMS Advisory Board is established to assist the commissioner. The board shall consist of the following members:(i) The commissioner, who shall serve as chairperson.(ii) The President of the Ambulance Association of Pennsylvania.(iii) The President of the Fire and Emergency Services Institute.(iv) Three members each who are EMS practitioners appointed by the Governor to represent the western, central and eastern regions of the State who do not hold an administrative role in an EMS agency. The members appointed must represent a volunteer, municipal and hospital-based EMS agency.(v) Three members appointed by the Governor who are currently serving or have served within the past five years as a chief or administrative officer of an EMS agency. The members appointed must represent a volunteer, municipal and hospital-based EMS agency.(vi) The members appointed under subparagraphs (iv) and (v) may not be from the same agency or county.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives, or their designees, shall serve as 20250HB1491PN1745 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonvoting members of the board.(3) The Governor shall appoint the following as nonvoting members of the board:(i) The County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania.(ii) The Pennsylvania Municipal League.(iii) The Pennsylvania State Association of Township Commissioners.(iv) The Pennsylvania State Association of Township Supervisors.(v) The Pennsylvania State Association of Boroughs.(vi) The Pennsylvania State Association of Councils of Government.(vii) The director of the Governor's Center for Local Government Services.(4) The Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council shall be a nonvoting member of the board.(5) Members of the board shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority.(6) A voting member of the board may appoint a designee who must be an employee of the same agency or organization as the voting member to attend meetings.(b) Duties.--The board shall advise and assist the commissioner on all matters pertaining to the following:(1) Legislation.(2) In consultation with the council, on basic life support protocols, rules, guidelines and regulations related to the administration and operation of the Statewide EMS plan.(3) The development, establishment and maintenance of 20250HB1491PN1745 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the comprehensive Statewide EMS plan.(4) The development of regulations pursuant to the laws of the Commonwealth related to EMS and the comprehensive Statewide EMS plan.(5) In consultation with the council, the establishment of acceptable industry standards of EMS protocols. The board shall also assist with the development of EMS equipment lists, which shall be posted on the commissioner's publicly accessible Internet website.(6) The establishment, evaluation and updates related to Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund priority listings.(7) The development of standards for performance reviews and quality assurance programs for the regional EMS councils.(8) Advice and recommendations on training standards, including education standards to be adhered to by any recipient of Commonwealth funding for the provision of EMS training and certification.(9) Any programs administered by the commissioner related to EMS, any other matter the commissioner may request or as directed by the General Assembly.(c) Open meetings.--Meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings) and the board shall meet at least quarterly or at the times and places as called by the commissioner. A majority of the members appointed to the board shall constitute a quorum.(d) Terms.--A member of the board shall serve continuously until replaced or removed by the appointing authority or until removed by the Governor for cause upon written notice to the board. A member's nonparticipation in three consecutive board meetings may be considered cause for removal.20250HB1491PN1745 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Quorum.--Eleven members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.(f) Compensation.--Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary travel and other expenses in connection with attendance at meetings called by the chairperson.Section 5. Sections 8106, 8107.3(a), 8107.4, 8108, 8109, 8111(a), (c), (d) and (e), 8112 and 8112.1 of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 8106. Emergency medical services patient care reports.(a) Preparation.--An EMS agency shall ensure that its responding EMS providers complete an EMS patient care report for each response made in which it encounters a patient or a person who has been identified as a patient to the EMS agency, unless the [department] commissioner by regulation exempts certain types of patient contact from the reporting requirement. The [department] commissioner shall employ an electronic EMS patient care reporting process that shall solicit standardized data and patient information. The [department] commissioner may require an EMS agency to complete a different standardized report or different fields in a standardized report based upon the type of resources the EMS agency uses in responding. The [department] commissioner shall permit an EMS agency to file a paper report for extraordinary reasons as determined by the [department] commissioner on a case-by-case basis.(b) Content.--The report shall contain information as solicited on the form or other reporting process developed by the [department] commissioner. The reporting process shall solicit essential information in reasonable detail. The [department] commissioner may also use the reporting process to 20250HB1491PN1745 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collect data to enhance its ability to carry out its responsibilities under sections 8104 (relating to emergency medical services system programs) and 8105 (relating to duties of [department] commissioner).(c) Patient medical record.--If a patient is transported to a hospital or from a hospital to another health care facility, information about the patient and EMS performed on the patient that is solicited through the reporting process shall be provided by the EMS agency to the hospital or other health care facility and become part of the patient's medical record.(d) Reporting.--An EMS agency shall report to the [department] commissioner or a regional EMS council, as determined by [department] regulation, data that is solicited through the reporting process.(e) Confidentiality.--(1) Patient information collected by an EMS agency shall be confidential and shall not be released by the EMS agency or a health care facility except as follows:(i) To the patient who is the subject of the report or to a person who is authorized to exercise the rights of the patient with respect to securing the report.(ii) Pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, including a subpoena when it constitutes a court order, except that disclosure pursuant to a subpoena shall not be permitted as to information in the report that is of such nature that disclosure pursuant to a subpoena is not otherwise authorized by law.(iii) To a health care provider to whom a patient's medical record may be released under the law.(iv) For billing purposes.20250HB1491PN1745 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) For quality improvement activities.(vi) To the [department] commissioner or a regional EMS council for the purpose of investigating possible violations of this chapter or related regulations.(vii) To a government agency or its agent, as authorized by the [department] commissioner, for the purpose of the agency performing official government duties.(2) Notwithstanding the duty of confidentiality applicable to [department] commissioner and regional EMS councils concerning reports under paragraph (1), the report may be released for specific research or EMS planning purposes approved by the [department] commissioner, subject to [department] commissioner approval and supervision to ensure that use of the report is strictly limited to the purposes of the research.(f) Vendors.--A vendor may not sell or otherwise provide or offer reporting forms or software marketed as appropriate for use in making reports required under this section unless the vendor submits the product to the [department] commissioner for review and receives [department] commissioner approval. Thereafter, the vendor shall submit any modification of the product to the [department] commissioner for review and approval if the vendor intends to offer the modified product for use in the EMS patient care reporting process. If the [department] commissioner makes changes to the EMS patient care report, it shall publish a notice of the changes in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The effective date for the changes shall be no fewer than 60 days following publication. After publication of changes, a vendor may not market a product as one appropriate 20250HB1491PN1745 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for use in making an EMS patient care report, any reporting forms or software approved by the [department] commissioner prior to publication of the changes, unless the vendor clearly discloses that the forms or software were approved prior to publication of the changes. The [department] commissioner may assess a vendor a $5,000 civil penalty for each day a vendor violates the provisions of this subsection.§ 8107.3. Funding.(a) Distribution.--[Beginning fiscal year 2008-2009 and each year thereafter, the] The Department of Human Services shall distribute annually, from available funds appropriated for this purpose, a supplemental payment to each accredited Level I or Level II trauma center or each Level III trauma center or hospital seeking Level III accreditation as provided in section 8107.1(b) (relating to accreditation of trauma centers) for the purpose of improving access to readily available and coordinated trauma care for the citizens of this Commonwealth.* * *§ 8107.4. Notification of trauma center closure.A hospital that receives funds under section 8107.3 (relating to funding) shall notify the [department] commissioner, the foundation and the Department of Human Services of its intent to cease operation of its trauma center no later than 60 days prior to closure of that trauma center.§ 8108. State Advisory [Board] Council.(a) Designation and composition.--The [board] council shall be composed of volunteer, professional and paraprofessional organizations involved in EMS. The [board] council shall be geographically representative of the provider organizations that represent EMS providers, firefighters, regional EMS councils, 20250HB1491PN1745 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 physicians, hospital administrators and other health care providers concerned with EMS. The [board] council may be composed of up to 30 organizations. Each organization that is a member of the [Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council] council and is elected to serve as a member on the [board] council shall have one vote on the [board] council.(b) Duties.--The duties of the [board] council shall be to:(1) Elect officers.(2) Advise the [department concerning manpower and training, communications, EMS agencies, content of regulations,] commissioner concerning EMS clinical and basic life support protocol standards and policies promulgated by the [department] commissioner under this chapter [and other subjects deemed appropriate by the department].(3) Serve as the forum for discussion on the content of [the] Statewide EMS system [plan] clinical plans or changes, or any proposed revisions thereto, and advise the [department] commissioner as to the content of the plan.(c) Open meetings.--Meetings of the [board] council shall be held in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(d) Terms.--A voting member of the [board] council shall serve a three-year term. A voting member shall not serve more than two consecutive terms.(e) Quorum.--A simple majority of the voting members of the [board] council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.(f) Compensation.--Members of the [board] council shall serve without compensation, except the [Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council] council, through its contract or grant 20250HB1491PN1745 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with the [department] commissioner, may pay necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by members of the [board] council while performing their official duties.(g) Contracts and grants.--The [department] commissioner shall contract with or provide a grant to the [board] council for performance of its work under subsection (b). Contracts and grants between the [department and the board] commissioner and the council for the performance of work other than under subsection (b) shall be subject to section 8112 (relating to contracts and grants) where applicable.§ 8109. Regional emergency medical services councils.(a) Purpose.--Regional EMS councils shall assist the [department] commissioner in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Each regional EMS council shall adhere to policy direction from the [department] commissioner.(b) Organization.--For purposes of this chapter, the organizational structure of a regional EMS council shall be representative of the public, health professions and major private and public voluntary agencies, organizations and institutions concerned with providing EMS in the region and shall be one of the following:(1) A unit of general local government, with an advisory council, meeting requirements for representation.(2) A representative public entity administering a compact or other areawide arrangement or consortium.(3) Any other public or private nonprofit entity that meets requirements for representation as determined by the [department] commissioner.(c) Duties.--Each regional EMS council shall, if directed by the [department] commissioner:20250HB1491PN1745 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Assist the [department] commissioner in achieving the Statewide and regional EMS system components and goals described under section 8104 (relating to emergency medical services system programs).(2) Assist the [department] commissioner in the collection and maintenance of standardized data and information as provided in section 8106 (relating to emergency medical services patient care reports).(3) Prepare, annually review and revise, as needed, a regional EMS system plan for the EMS region the [department] commissioner has designated and for which the [department] commissioner has contracted or provided a grant to it to serve.(4) Carry out, to the extent feasible, the Statewide and regional EMS system plans.(5) Assure the reasonable availability of training and continuing education programs for EMS providers.(6) Provide necessary and reasonable staff services and appropriate and convenient office facilities that can serve as the EMS region's location for the planning, maintenance and coordinative and evaluative functions of the council.(7) Establish a mechanism to provide for input from facilities and EMS agencies in the EMS region in decisions that include, but are not limited to, membership on its governing body.(8) Establish, subject to [department] commissioner approval, regional EMS triage, treatment and transportation protocols consistent with Statewide protocols adopted by the [department] commissioner. A regional EMS council may also establish, subject to [department] commissioner approval, 20250HB1491PN1745 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional triage, treatment and transportation protocols. No regional protocol shall be subject to the rulemaking process.(9) Advise public safety answering points and municipal and county governments as to the EMS resources available for dispatching and recommend dispatch criteria that may be developed by the [department] commissioner or the council as approved by the [department] commissioner.(10) Assist the [department] commissioner in achieving a unified Statewide EMS system.(11) Designate a regional EMS medical director and establish a medical advisory committee and a quality improvement committee.(12) Develop a conflict of interest policy, subject to [department] commissioner approval, and require its board or advisory council members, officials and employees to agree to the policy in writing.(13) Perform other duties assigned by the [department] commissioner to assist the [department] commissioner in carrying out the requirements of this chapter.(d) Regional EMS medical directors.--The [department] commissioner shall consult with the regional EMS medical directors in developing and adopting EMS protocols and may consult with them on any matter involved in the [department's] commissioner's administration of this chapter.§ 8111. Comprehensive plan.(a) Preparation.--(1) The [department] commissioner, with the assistance of the board, shall prepare a Statewide EMS system plan, which plan shall include both short-range and long-range goals and objectives, and shall make the plan available to 20250HB1491PN1745 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the General Assembly and all concerned agencies, entities and individuals.(2) A regional EMS system plan, upon approval of the [department] commissioner, shall:(i) Become part of the Statewide EMS system plan.(ii) Include for the EMS region the same types of information that subsection (b) requires for the Statewide plan.* * *(c) Revisions.--(1) The [department] commissioner shall collect and analyze EMS data for the purpose of:(i) Revising the Statewide EMS system plan, including determining the status of the Statewide EMS system, the degree of compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the effectiveness of EMS systems in reducing morbidity and mortality associated with medical emergencies.(ii) Planning future EMS system initiatives.(2) Persons regulated by the [department] commissio ner under this chapter and dispatchers of EMS agencies shall provide data, without charge, as reasonably requested by the [department] commissioner and regional EMS councils, to aid them in developing and revising Statewide and regional EMS system plans and in conducting investigations under this chapter as authorized by the [department] commissioner.(d) Annual reports.--The [department] commissioner shall annually publish comprehensive and specific reports of activity and plan implementation.(e) Use of Statewide plan.--20250HB1491PN1745 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The [department] commissioner shall use the Statewide plan for contract and grant purposes as set forth in section 8112(a) (relating to contracts and grants).(2) Nothing in the Statewide plan shall be construed to vest the [department] commissioner with any regulatory authority.§ 8112. Contracts and grants.(a) General power.--The [department] commissioner may enter into contracts or grants with entities to serve as regional EMS councils responsible for the initiation, expansion, maintenance and improvement of regional EMS systems that are in accordance with the Statewide EMS system plan.(b) Limitation.--An entity with which the [department] commissioner enters into a contract or grant under this section to serve as a regional EMS council shall carry out the duties assigned by the [department] commissioner under section 8109(c) (relating to regional emergency medical services councils).(c) Purposes.--In contracting with or giving a grant to regional EMS councils, the [department] commissioner may allocate Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund moneys appropriated to the [department] commissioner only for the following purposes:(1) Providing programs of public education, information, health promotion and prevention regarding EMS.(2) Purchasing ambulances, other EMS vehicles, medical equipment and rescue equipment.(3) Applying to costs associated with conducting training and testing programs for EMS providers.(4) Applying to costs associated with inspections and investigations conducted to assist the [department] 20250HB1491PN1745 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commissioner to carry out its regulatory authority under this chapter.(5) Purchasing communications equipment and services, including alerting equipment, provided that the purchases are in accordance with the Statewide EMS system plan.(6) Assisting with the merger of EMS agencies or assisting an EMS agency to acquire another EMS agency, when the [department] commissioner determines circumstances exist such that the transaction and financial assistance are needed to serve the public interest.(7) Applying to costs associated with the maintenance and operation of regional EMS councils. Those costs may include, but shall not be limited to, salaries, wages and benefits of staff, travel, equipment and supplies, leasing of office space and other costs incidental to the conduct of business which are deemed by the [department] commissioner to be necessary and appropriate for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.(8) Applying to costs associated with collection and analysis of data necessary to evaluate the effectiveness of EMS systems in providing EMS and to administer quality improvement programs.(9) Applying to costs associated with assisting EMS agencies to recruit and retain EMS providers.(d) Restriction.--In contracting with or providing grants to regional EMS councils, the [department] commissioner may not allocate Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund moneys appropriated to the [department] commissioner for the following purposes:(1) Acquisition, construction or rehabilitation of 20250HB1491PN1745 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities or buildings, except renovation as may be necessary for the implementation or modification of EMS communication systems.(2) Purchasing hospital equipment, other than communications equipment for medical command and receiving facilities, unless the equipment is used or intended to be used in an equipment exchange program with EMS agencies.(3) Maintenance of ambulances, other EMS vehicles and equipment.(4) Applying to costs deemed by the [department] commissioner as inappropriate for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.(5) Applying to costs which are normally borne by patients, except for extraordinary costs as determined by the [department] commissioner.(e) Reports.--The recipient of a contract or grant under this chapter shall make reports to the [department] commissioner as may be required by the [department] commissioner.(f) Contract and grant prerequisites.--The [department] commissioner shall not contract with or provide a grant to an entity for that entity to serve as a regional EMS council unless:(1) The entity has submitted a contract or grant application to the [department] commissioner in a form and format prescribed by the [department] commissioner that is consistent with the Statewide and regional EMS system plans.(2) The application addresses planning, maintenance and improvement of the regional EMS system.(3) The entity demonstrates to the [department's] commissioner's satisfaction the qualifications and commitment 20250HB1491PN1745 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to plan, maintain and improve a regional EMS system and that the entity has the required organizational structure and provisions for representation of appropriate entities.(g) Technical assistance.--The [department] commissioner shall provide technical assistance, as appropriate, to regional EMS councils and to such other eligible entities as necessary for the purpose of their carrying out the provisions of contracts and grants under this section, with special consideration for contractors and grantees representing rural areas.(h) Payments.--Payments pursuant to a contract or grant under this section may be made in advance or by way of reimbursement and in installments and on conditions as the [department] commissioner determines will most effectively carry out the provisions of this chapter.(i) Other funds considered.--(1) In determining the amount of a contract or grant under this section, the amount of funds available to the contractor or grantee from non-State contributions and Federal grant or contract programs pertaining to EMS shall be taken into consideration.(2) For purposes of this subsection, "non-State contributions" include the outlay of cash and in-kind services to the contractor or grantee or toward the operation of a regional EMS system by private, public or government third parties, including the Federal Government.(j) Other contracts and grants.--The [department] commissioner may enter into contracts and grants with organizations other than regional EMS councils in order to assist the [department] commissioner in complying with the 20250HB1491PN1745 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of this [section and] chapter.(k) Public disclosure.--(1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2), finalized contracts and grants shall be deemed public records subject to disclosure.(2) The [department] commissioner may not disclose information in contracts or grants that could be used by persons to undermine measures to combat, respond to or recover from terrorist attacks.(l) Sole source contract or grant.--Upon expiration of a contract or grant with an entity to carry out the duties of a regional EMS council as set forth in subsection (c), the [department] commissioner, without undertaking a competitive bidding process, may enter into a new contract or grant with the same entity for that entity to continue to serve as a regional EMS council and perform the duties set forth in subsection (c), as determined by the [department] commissioner, if that entity, in carrying out the prior contract or grant, demonstrated its ability and commitment to the [department's] commissioner's satisfaction to plan, maintain and improve the regional EMS system consistent with the terms of the prior contract or grant.§ 8112.1. Scholarships for recruitment, training and retention.(a) Utilization.--Except as provided under subsection (d), money transferred under 3 Pa.C.S. § 1113(a)(4) (relating to disposition of certain funds) shall be utilized by the [department's Bureau of Emergency Medical Services] commissioner to:(1) Issue scholarships to EMS providers who complete EMS training provided by an approved entity under section 8105(b)(6) (relating to duties of [department] commissioner).20250HB1491PN1745 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Reimburse EMS agencies for recruitment and retention costs, which are to be determined by the [department's Bureau of Emergency Medical Services] commissioner.(3) Make available a pilot program for high school students with instruction through partnerships between institutions of higher education in this Commonwealth and school entities or nonpublic schools, or both, to increase the number of individuals capable of becoming EMS providers. The pilot program shall be conducted in accordance with section 7 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act. The following shall apply:(i) The [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner shall accept proposals from institutions of higher education in this Commonwealth for the pilot program. From the proposals submitted, the [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner shall select three institutions of higher education to offer a pilot program. The [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner, to the greatest extent practicable, shall select one institution of higher education from each eastern, central and western region of this Commonwealth. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit an institution of higher education from incorporating fire instruction into the pilot program.(ii) An institution of higher education selected by the [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner under subparagraph (i) shall operate the pilot program by entering into an 20250HB1491PN1745 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement with a school entity or nonpublic school, or both, for the provision of instruction to students who are in at least the ninth grade.(iii) The EMS Training Fund is established in the State Treasury. The [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner may accept monetary donations and other money for deposit into the EMS Training Fund from a person, business, foundation, tax-exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) or government entity on behalf of the Commonwealth.(iv) The [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner shall disburse no less than $50,000 from the EMS Training Fund to each institution of higher education operating the pilot program for each year of the pilot program. After the fourth year of operation of the pilot program, the [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner may not disburse money from the EMS Training Fund.(v) The State Treasurer shall transfer any money appropriated, transferred or donated for the pilot program into the EMS Training Fund, and interest earned on the money in the EMS Training Fund shall remain in the EMS Training Fund.(b) Application.--An individual shall submit an application for a scholarship to the [department] commissioner on a form approved by the [department] commissioner.(c) Form.--The scholarships shall be in the form of:20250HB1491PN1745 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Reimbursement to EMS providers who obtain certification upon successful completion of EMS training by an approved provider.(2) Reimbursement to an EMS agency for recruitment and retention costs, which are to be determined by the [department's Bureau of Emergency Medical Services] commissioner.(d) Administrative costs.--No more than $50,000 of the money transferred under 3 Pa.C.S. § 1113(a)(4) may be used by the [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services] commissioner for administrative costs.(e) Annual reports.--(1) The [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner shall prepare an annual report on the scholarships under subsection (a)(1) and the pilot program under subsection (a)(3). The report shall include all of the following information:(i) The total number of scholarship applications received.(ii) The total number of scholarship applications approved and the amounts funded for each recipient.(iii) An analysis of the classes taken and the levels of education obtained through the scholarships.(iv) The number of applications received for the pilot program.(v) The applications approved for the pilot program.(vi) The number of high school students served by the pilot program.(2) The [Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health] commissioner shall submit the annual 20250HB1491PN1745 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report under paragraph (1) no later than October 1, 2023, and by October 1 of each year thereafter, to all of the following:(i) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The Secretary of Health shall post the annual report under paragraph (1) on the [department's] commissioner's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 6. Except as otherwise provided in this act, all activities initiated by the Department of Health shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed by the State Emergency Medical Services Commissioner. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made by the Department of Health and which are in effect on the effective date of this section shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified by the State Emergency Medical Services Commissioner. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into by the Department of Health are not affected nor impaired by this act.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1491PN1745 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324